Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3752
Commission; employees.

The commission may appoint and fix the salary of such support staff and employees, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission, as may be required for the proper discharge of the functions of the commission.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 18.